pt-PT: Tipo de utilização do monte: Bullpen; Jogo; Multifunções; Prática; Outro
nb: Brukstype for pitchermound: Bullpen; Kamp; Flerbruk; Trening; Annet
zh-CN: 坡道使用类型: 牛棚; 比赛; 多用途; 练习; 其他
th: ประเภทการใช้งานเนินดิน: จุดซ้อมขว้าง; แข่งขัน; อเนกประสงค์; ฝึกซ้อม; อื่นๆ
da: Brugstype for pitcherhøj: Bullpen; Kamp; Multifunktionel; Træning; Andet
tr: Atış tümseği kullanım türü: Bullpen; Maç; Çok amaçlı; Antrenman; Diğer
es: Tipo de uso del montículo: Bullpen; Juego; Multiuso; Práctica; Otro
ro-RO: Tipul de utilizare al suportului de montare: Bullpen; Joc; Multifuncțional; Antrenament; Altele
bg-BG: Тип предназначение на могила: Булпен; Мач; Многофункционален; Тренировка; Друго
en: Mound usage type: Bullpen; Game; Multi-purpose; Practice; Other
pt-BR: Montinho de arremesso tipo de uso: Bullpen; Jogo; Multiuso; Prática; Outros
ru: Тип использования питчерской горки: Буллпен; Игра; Многоцелевой; Тренировка; Другое
fi: Kummun käyttötapa: Bullpen; Peli; Monikäyttöinen; Harjoittelu; Muu
el: Τύπος χρήσης αναχώματος: Bullpen; Αγώνας; Πολλαπλών χρήσεων; Προπόνηση; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ využitia mohyly: Bullpen; Zápas; Viacúčelové; Tréning; Iné
sl-SI: Vrsta uporabe nasipa: Bullpen (pripravljalnica); Tekma; Večnamensko; Trening; Drugo
nl: Mound gebruikstype: Bullpen; Wedstrijd; Multifunctioneel; Oefening; Overig
hr-HR: Vrsta uporabe nasipa: Bullpen; Utakmica; Višenamjensko; Trening; Ostalo
de: Verwendungszweck des Wurfhügels: Bullpen; Spiel; Mehrzweck; Training; Sonstige
sv: Typ av användning för kulle: Bullpen; Match; Flerfunktion; Träning; Övrigt
fr: Type d’usage du monticule de lancer: Enclos des releveurs; Match; Polyvalent; Entraînement; Autre
vi: Loại hình sử dụng gò đất: Bullpen; Thi đấu; Đa năng; Tập luyện; Khác
zh-TW: 投手丘使用類型: 牛棚; 比賽; 多用途; 練習; 其他
hu: Domb használati típusa: Bullpen; Mérkőzés; Többcélú; Edzés; Egyéb
lt-LT: Metiko kalnelio naudojimo tipas: Apšilimo aikštelė (angl. „bullpen“); Rungtynės; Daugiafunkcis; Treniruotės; Kita
cs: Typ využití kopce: Bullpen; Zápas; Víceúčelové; Trénink; Jiné
ja: 塚の使用タイプ: ブルペン; 試合; 多目的; 練習; その他
pl: Typ wykorzystania kopca: Bullpen; Mecz; Wielofunkcyjne; Treningowe; Inne
it: Tipo di utilizzo del monte di lancio: Bullpen; Partita; Multiuso; Allenamento; Altro
ko: 마운드 사용 유형: 불펜; 게임; 다목적; 연습용; 기타